Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Chapter 3 Child Support and Revenue Enhancement Account

§ 42-3-101.
Creation; deposits.

The child support and revenue enhancement account is created.

The following payments, collections and revenues shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit to the credit of the child support and revenue enhancement account:

Child support payments collected under the Child Support Enforcement Act;

Fees collected pursuant to W.S. 20-6-105(b); and

All funds collected under the overpayment and fraud recovery program of the department.

For purposes of this chapter, “department” means the department of family services created by W.S.

9-2-2006

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 81, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 42-1-132; Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the trust and agency fund” in (a).

Child Support Enforcement Act. —

See §§

20-6-101

and 20-6-102(a)(vii), and notes thereto.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 42-3-102.
Administration.

The department shall administer the funds in the child support and revenue enhancement account and report annually to the joint appropriations interim committee and joint judiciary interim committee. The account may be divided into subaccounts for purposes of administrative management.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 81, § 1; W.S. § 42-1-132; Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 2008, ch. 44, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “joint appropriations interim committee and joint judiciary interim committee” for “legislature.”

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

§ 42-3-103.
Authorized expenditures.

Funds in the child support and revenue enhancement account shall be expended only as authorized by this section.

The department may at any time disburse funds in the account for:

Payments to support obligees and disbursements required under the guidelines of the federal child support enforcement program;

Authorized transfers of the federal share of funds collected under the child support enforcement program and the division’s overpayment and fraud recovery program;

Incentive payments as provided by W.S. 20-6-106(j);

Reimbursement to the department of health for costs under Title XIX of the Social Security Act or may retain funds to pay for the costs of foster care or minimum medical program benefits; and

Reimbursement to service providers for the costs of collection under the child support enforcement and overpayment recovery programs.

Subject to legislative appropriation, the state’s share of funds in the account shall be expended for:

Administrative costs of the child support enforcement program;

Funding of benefits under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program; and

Other administrative costs of the department.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if funds are recovered by the department under the overpayment and fraud recovery program within the same biennial period during which the funds were originally appropriated, the department may expend those funds for the purposes for which they were appropriated without further legislative appropriation.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 81, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 42-1-132; Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; ch. 221, § 2; 1997, ch. 196, § 1.

Social Security Act. —

Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, referred to in subsection (b)(iv), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.